Adjectives.lexc
!While SetE is the same for Nouns and Adpositions, I repeated the 3sg form with just an adjective tag.

Multichar_Symbols
@U.ALIEN.NO@
@U.ALIEN.YES@
@U.ADJ.YES@
@U.ADJ.NO@
-1sg.poss
-2sg.poss
-3sg.poss
-1pl.poss
-2pl.poss
-3pl.poss
-n'
-ka'
-h
-k
-ka% ay
-h% lhik

LEXICON Root
    AdjPossclass ;

LEXICON AdjPossclass 
@U.ALIEN.NO@@U.ADJ.YES@ Adjectives ;

LEXICON Adjectives
ts'ama SetE ;
ɨran SetE ;
hawa SetE ;
pari SetE ;
mɨr'a SetE ;
pɨts'a SetE ;

LEXICON SetE
@U.ADJ.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-1sg.poss:@U.ADJ.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-n' # ;
@U.ADJ.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-2sg.poss:@U.ADJ.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-ka' # ;
@U.ADJ.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-3sg.poss:@U.ADJ.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-h # ;
@U.ADJ.YES@@U.ALIEN.NO@-3sg.poss:@U.ADJ.YES@@U.ALIEN.NO@-h # ;
@U.ADJ.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-1pl.poss:@U.ADJ.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-k # ;
@U.ADJ.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-2pl.poss:@U.ADJ.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-ka% ay # ;
@U.ADJ.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-3pl.poss:@U.ADJ.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-h% lhik # ;
@U.ALIEN.YES@ # ;
@U.ADJ.YES@@U.ALIEN.NO@ # ;
